Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2012
Niobrara Council; zoning jurisdiction.

The Niobrara Council shall not have zoning jurisdiction outside the boundaries of the Niobrara scenic river corridor.

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 8.